runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
адвербіалізуватися/Z|w
алгоритмізувати/Z|wO
анотувати/Z|wO
асистувати/Z|w
балабонити/Z|wL
бджолярувати/Z|w
благоденствувати/Z|w
бомжувати/Z|w
бронювати/Z|wO
буркнути/Z
вакуумувати/Z|wO
вбрукувати/ZO
вволювати/Z|w(
вгостити/ZM
вдумуватися/Z|w
вжалити/ZLO
взаконити/ZLO
вибороти/ZO
вив'язуватися/Z|w
вивіюватися/Z|w
вигноїти/ZO
вигризти/ZO
визеленитися/Z
виконувати/Z|w(
вилікуватися/Z
вимогти/Z
виперти/Zn
випровадити/ZOL
висвистіти/Z
висолоджувати/Z|w
витерпіти/Z
виуджуватися/Z|w
вицяткувати/ZO(
виштурхувати/Z|w(
відвернутися/Z
віддзвонитися/Z
відкинутися/Z
відловити/ZMO
відособити/ZO
відрадити/ZOL
відсмикувати/Z|w
відтранспортувати/ZO
відчистити/ZLO9
вітамінізуватися/Z|w
власкавлювати/Z|w
внормуватися/Z
вплигувати/Z|w
вроблювати/Z|w
встояти/Z
втратити/ZLO
вщемити/ZM
генеруватися/Z|w
головувати/Z|w
грюкнути/Z
дезінформуватися/Z|w
денітрифікувати/Z|w
дзенькнути/Z
днювати/Z|w
догнутися/Z
доклепатися/Z[
домилити/ZLO
допектися/Z
досвердлювати/Z|w(
дотерти/Zn
драматизуватися/Z|w
експропріювати/Z|wO
жмакувати/Z|w
забандажувати/ZO
забубоніти/Z
завиблискувати/Z
загалузитися/Z
загоджувати/Z|w
задавнювати/Z|w
задружити/Z
заінтересуватися/Z
закінчитися/ZML
законтрактуватися/Z
закруглюватися/Z|w
заліснювати/Z|w
замаякувати/Z
замочити/ZMO
зануритися/ZL
запечатувати/Z|w(
заполірувати/ZO
запудрити/ZMO
зарубцьовуватися/Z|w
засклепитися/Z
засолонцюватися/Z
застрягнути/Z
затіснитися/Z
затурчати/Z
захлипуватися/Z|w
зацукрюватися/Z|w
зашептати/Z
заштуковувати/Z|w
збентежитися/ZL
звергнути/Zn
зглибити/Z
здзвонитися/ZM
зіграватися/Z|w
зліквідувати/ZO
змиршавіти/Z
зневажити/ZOL
знецукрити/ZO
зревізувати/ZO
зумовлюватися/Z|w
інгібувати/Z|wO
ісламізувати/Z|wO
катуватися/Z|w
ковтнути/Z
конспектуватися/Z|w
коцюбитися/Z|w
купчитися/Z|w
лідерувати/Z|w
макетуватися/Z|w
металувати/Z|w
моніторитися/Z|wL
набрехатися/Z
нагаласувати/Z
надзижчати/Z
надточуватися/Z|w
наклепати/Z([
належати/Z|wL(
намолочувати/Z|w
напліскувати/Z|w
нариштовувати/Z|w
насолодитися/ZM
натомитися/ZM
нацьковувати/Z|w(
недовипустити/ZMO
недорахуватися/Z
нумерувати/Z|wO
обгонитися/Z
обкреслити/ZOLM
обмелювати/Z|w
обрамити/ZO
обсушувати/Z|w(
оговтуватися/Z|w
озвучувати/Z|w(
олюднити/ZO
оприлюднювати/Z|w(
осліпити/ZMO
офранцузити/ZOL
паразитувати/Z|w
перебовтувати/Z|w(
перевпорядковувати/Z|w
передертися/Z
перездавати/Z|w
перекотити/ZMO
перелягти/Z
перенаголосити/ZO
переоформитися/ZL
перепомпувати/ZO
пересварити/ZMO
перестрілюватися/Z|w
переупаковувати/Z|w(
перешпилити/ZOM
підварюватися/Z|w
підіткнути/Zn
підлетіти/Z
підпекти/ZO
підсіктися/Z
підтоплюватися/Z|w
пластифікувати/Z|wO
поборюватися/Z|w
повиїздити/Z
повитоплювати/Z(
повнити/Z|w
погорланити/ZL
подоважувати/Z(
позаболочуватися/Z
позапечатувати/Z
позвужувати/Z(
покарантинити/Z
покривавитися/Z
полуденкувати/Z|w
помпувати/Z|w
понамилюватися/Z
понумерувати/ZO
поодкушувати/Z(
попереорювати/Z(
попідстругувати/Z
пополуденкувати/Z
попримощувати/Z(
порекомендуватися/Z
порозмірковувати/Z
порябити/Z
послужити/ZM
постукувати/Z|w
потріскотати/Z
похнюпитися/ZL
пошахраювати/Z
приберегти/ZO
пригодувати/ZO
прикопувати/Z|w
примирювати/Z|w
приперчуватися/Z|w
прискорюватися/Z|w
притарабанити/ZL
причаїтися/ZM
пробуджувати/Z|w(
проглянути/Zn
продмухувати/Z|w
прокльовуватися/Z|w
проляскотіти/Z
прооліювати/Z|w
пророчити/Z|wL
проставити/ZLO
протопити/ZMO
прочеркувати/Z|w
радикалізувати/Z|wO
рейтингуватися/Z|w
рихтувати/Z|wO
розбушувати/Z
розгойдуватися/Z|w
роздушитися/ZM
розклювати/ZO
розкуйовджувати/Z|w
розмахувати/Z|w
розпарити/ZLO
розпрасуватися/Z
розсідлуватися/Z|w
розтискуватися/Z|w
розхристуватися/Z|w
розщіплювати/Z|w
самознищуватися/Z|w
своячитися/Z|w
скаламучувати/Z|w(
скомпенсувати/ZO
скріпитися/ZM
солитися/ZM|w
спізнаватися/Z|w
спольщитися/Z
спрощуватися/Z|w
стішитися/ZL
струмуватися/Z|w
сформулюватися/Z
творитися/ZM|w
токарювати/Z|w
трієруватися/Z|w
ув'язнювати/Z|w(
угребтися/Z
укапуватися/Z|w
уломлювати/Z|w
унормувати/ZO
упросити/ZMO
ускакувати/Z|w
утилізуватися/Z|w
учавлюватися/Z|w
фіксуватися/Z|w
хазяйнувати/Z|w
хрокнути/Z
чабанувати/Z|w
шаруватися/Z|w
шпунтувати/Z|wO
